Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,343
Snowmobiles; violations; penalty.

(1) Any person who violates any provision of sections 60-6,320 to 60-6,346 or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to such sections shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor, and if such person is convicted of a second or subsequent offense within any period of one year, he or she shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(2) Any violation of such sections which is also a violation under any other provision of Chapter 60 may be punished under the penalty provisions thereof.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 21;

Laws 1977, LB 230, § 16;

Laws 1979, LB 149, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2021;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 440.